District of Columbia statutes.
42-3507.05

Tenant hot line.

The Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs shall provide for the continuation of a tenant hot line. The primary purpose of the tenant hot line is to provide assistance to low- and moderate-income tenants. To carry out this purpose, the functions and responsibilities shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1)

Answering rent control procedural questions, and directing tenants toward possible courses of action in resolving problems;

(2)

Providing advice on housing regulation violations;

(3)

Explaining rent increases;

(4)

Providing guidance on emergency shelter;

(5)

Providing guidance on the Tenant Assistance Program;

(6)

Providing guidance in resolving problems involving water, heating, repairs, and other matters;

(7)

Providing advice on possible action in response to allegations of discrimination, harassment, or neglect by housing providers;

(8)

Answering preliminary questions about remedies through the courts;

(9)

Providing guidance when tenants are faced with eviction; and

(10)

Providing guidance on other tenant problems.

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 705, 32 DCR 3089

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2575.

Expiration of Law

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 45-2571.